District of Columbia statutes.
28-3110

Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the laws relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-83, § 2, 42 DCR 6773

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3110.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act.